Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.900.020

Moneys transferred.

All moneys in the Southwestern Washington State College bond retirement fund and the Southwestern Washington State College capital projects account are hereby transferred to The Evergreen State College bond retirement fund and The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which latter fund and account are created in RCW 28B.35.370.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.98.020. Formerly RCW 28B.98.020.]